Nevada, session 83, AB218.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB218_R1*

– 2 –
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. The Legislature hereby respectfully requests that the
Nevada Supreme Court:
1. Study procedures for notifying defendants and persons who
are issued a civil infraction citation of certain information,
including, without limitation, court dates, required court
appearances, missed court appearances and any required or missed
payments to the court;
2. In studying such procedures pursuant to subsection 1,
consider, without limitation, the best practices for notifying
defendants and persons who are issued a civil infraction citation,
input from interested community and justice system stakeholders
and the technological needs of the court system; and
3. Adopt court or administrative rules governing such
procedures.
H
-
*AB218_R1*